South Dakota, session 2026, HB1043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $978,294 from the general fund to the Department of
Health, for the purpose of reimbursing four family physicians, two physician assistants, and
six nurse practitioners who have, in the determination of the department, met the
requirements of § 34-12G-3.
Section 2. There is appropriated $370,000 from the general fund to the Department of
Health, for the purpose of reimbursing eligible health care professionals who have, in the
determination of the department, met the requirements of § 34-12G-12.
Section 3. The secretary of the Department of Health shall approve vouchers and the state
auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized by this Act.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 5. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.629.13 2 1043
An Act to make an appropriation to reimburse health care professionals who have complied
with the requirements for rural recruitment assistance programs, and to declare an
emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1043
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1043 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1043 ENROLLED